Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.020

Inspection and test by secretary of state—Report.

The secretary of state shall inspect, evaluate, and publicly test all voting systems or components of voting systems that are submitted for review under RCW 29A.12.030. The secretary of state shall determine whether the voting systems conform with all of the requirements of this title, the applicable rules adopted in accordance with this title, and with generally accepted safety requirements. The secretary of state shall transmit a copy of the report of any examination under this section, within thirty days after completing the examination, to the county auditor of each county.

[ 2003 c 111 s 302. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 18; 1982 c 40 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.33.041.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Severability—1982 c 40: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 40 s 11.]